Massachusetts, session 194th, H2176.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 151B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 3AAAA the following section:-
Section 3BBBB. Employer disclosure of immigration status to conceal violation of State
wage, benefit, tax laws, prohibited; penalties.
(a) If the Attorney General’s Fair Labor Division finds that an employer has, for the
purpose of concealing any violation of State wage, benefit and tax laws, disclosed or threatened
to disclose to a public body an employee's immigration status, the Division is, in addition to
imposing any other remedies or penalties authorized by law, authorized to assess and collect an
administrative penalty as follows:
(1) for the first violation, an administrative penalty not to exceed $2,500;
of 3

(2) for the second violation, an administrative penalty not to exceed $5,000; and
(3) for any subsequent violation, an administrative penalty not to exceed $10,000.
(b) When determining the amount of the administrative penalty imposed pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section, the Division shall consider factors which include the history of
previous violations by the employer, the seriousness of the violation, the good faith of the
employer, and the size of the employer's business. No administrative penalty shall be levied
pursuant to this section unless the Division provides the alleged violator with notification of the
violation and of the amount of administrative penalty and unless the Division provides the
alleged violator an opportunity to request a hearing before the Division or a designee deemed
appropriate by the Attorney General.
(c) For violations of subsection (a) of this section that occur for the purpose of concealing
a violation of any State wage, benefit, or tax law, other than the State unemployment and
disability benefits laws, the alleged violator may request a hearing within 15 days following
receipt of the notice. If a hearing is requested, the Division shall issue a final order upon such
hearing and a finding that the violation has occurred. If no hearing is requested, the notice shall
become a final order upon expiration of the 15-day period. For violations subject to this
subsection (c), payment of the administrative penalty shall be due when the final order is issued
or when the notice becomes the final order.
(d) For violations of subsection (a) of this section that occur for the purpose of concealing
a violation of the State unemployment and disability benefits laws, the alleged violator may
request a hearing in the manner and within the time prescribed by those laws, and payment of the
of 3

administrative penalty shall be due when assessment for contributions, penalties and interest are
due.
(e) Any administrative penalty imposed pursuant to this section may be recovered with
costs in a summary proceeding commenced by the Division or a designee deemed appropriate by
the Attorney General.
(f) Any sum collected as an administrative penalty pursuant to this section shall be
applied toward enforcement and administration costs of the Attorney General’s Fair Labor
Division within the Office of the Attorney General responsible for enforcement of the State wage
law, the violation of which the employer sought to conceal by disclosing or threatening to
disclose an employee's immigration status. Nothing in this section shall prevent the Division
from assessing interest, penalties, or other fees allowable by law.
(g) The Attorney General’s Office shall provide annual report annually of such violations
to the legislature no later than December 31st to the House and Senate Clerk.
of 3